Mississippi, session 2026, HB961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Definitions.  For purposes of this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Health care services" means any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose or otherwise affect an individual's physical or mental condition. (b)  "Health care provider" means an individual licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to provide health care services in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. (c)  "Medical facility" means any hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgical center, physician practice, laboratory or other entity licensed or regulated by the State of Mississippi that provides medical or health care services to patients. (d)  "Overpayment" means any payment received by a health care provider or medical facility from or on behalf of a patient that exceeds the total amount owed by the patient for services rendered, after final adjudication by all applicable payers, including private insurance, Medicare, Medicaid, or other third-party payers. (e)  "Final determination of overpayment" means the date on which a health care provider or medical facility has received all payments and explanations of benefits reasonably necessary to determine that an overpayment exists. (2)  Required refund of overpayments.  (a)  A health care provider or medical facility shall refund any overpayment to the patient or the patient's legal representative no later than sixty (60) days after the final determination of the overpayment. (b)  Refunds shall be issued automatically and shall not require a request by the patient. (c)  Refunds shall be made by the same method of payment used by the patient, when practicable, or by check or electronic funds transfer. (3)  Notice to patient.  At the time a refund is issued, the health care provider or medical facility shall provide the patient with a written or electronic notice explaining: (a)  The amount of the overpayment; (b)  The reason for the overpayment; and (c)  The date on which the overpayment was determined. (4)  Enforcement and penalties. (a)  The failure of a health care provider or medical facility to refund an overpayment within the timeframe required under this section may be subject to enforcement by the Mississippi Attorney General under the Mississippi Consumer Protection Act. (b)  A pattern or practice of knowingly failing to refund overpayments may constitute an unfair or deceptive trade practice. (c)  This act shall not limit any other remedy available to a patient under state or federal law. (5)  Rules and regulations. The State Department of Health may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 75-24-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-24-5.  (1)  Unfair methods of competition affecting commerce and unfair or deceptive trade practices in or affecting commerce are prohibited.  Action may be brought under Section 75-24-5(1) only under the provisions of Section 75-24-9. (2)  Without limiting the scope of subsection (1) of this section, the following unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive trade practices or acts in the conduct of any trade or commerce are * * *hereby prohibited: (a)  Passing off goods or services as those of another; (b)  Misrepresentation of the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services; (c)  Misrepresentation of affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by another; (d)  Misrepresentation of designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services; (e)  Representing that goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection that he does not have; (f)  Representing that goods are original or new if they are reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand; (g)  Representing that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they are of another; (h)  Disparaging the goods, services, or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact; (i)  Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised; (j)  Advertising goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity; (k)  Misrepresentations of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions; (l)  Advertising by or on behalf of any licensed or regulated health care professional which does not specifically describe the license or qualifications of the licensed or regulated health care professional; (m)  Charging an increased premium for reinstating a motor vehicle insurance policy that was cancelled or suspended by the insured solely for the reason that he was transferred out of this state while serving in the United States Armed Forces or on active duty in the National Guard or United States Armed Forces Reserve. It is also an unfair practice for an insurer to charge an increased premium for a new motor vehicle insurance policy if the applicant for coverage or his covered dependents were previously insured with a different insurer and canceled that policy solely for the reason that he was transferred out of this state while serving in the United States Armed Forces or on active duty in the National Guard or United States Armed Forces Reserve.  For purposes of determining premiums, an insurer shall consider such persons as having maintained continuous coverage.  The provisions of this paragraph (m) shall apply only to such instances when the insured does not drive the vehicle during the period of cancellation or suspension of his policy; (n)  Violating the provisions of Section 75-24-8; (o)  Violating the provisions of Section 73-3-38; (p)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 149, Mississippi Code of 1972; * * * and (q)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 45, Chapter 38, Mississippi Code of 1972 * * *.; (r)  Violating any of the provisions of Title 41, Chapter 151, Mississippi Code of 1972 * * *.; and (s)  Violating any provision of Section 1 of this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.